Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.700.050

Grants to develop or upgrade high-demand career and technical education programs.

Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grants to middle schools, high schools, or skill centers, to develop or upgrade high-demand career and technical education programs as identified under RCW 28A.700.020. Grant funds shall be allocated on a one-time basis and may be used to purchase or improve curriculum, create preapprenticeship programs, upgrade technology and equipment to meet industry standards, and for other purposes intended to initiate a new program or improve the rigor and quality of a high-demand program. Priority in allocating the funds shall be given to programs that are also considered high cost due to the types of technology and equipment necessary to maintain industry certification. Priority shall also be given to programs considered in most high demand in the state or applicable region.

[ 2008 c 170 s 105.]